Washington statutes.
RCW 9.08.078

Illegal sale, receipt, or transfer of pet animals—Separate offenses.

(1) The sale, receipt, or transfer of each individual pet animal in violation of RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078 constitutes a separate offense.

(2) The provisions of RCW 9.08.070 through 9.08.078 shall not apply to the lawful acts of any employee, agent, or director of any humane society, animal control agency, or animal shelter operated by or on behalf of any government agency, operating under law.

[ 2003 c 53 s 13.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.